ani_nouns_formation.lexd
# -------------------------------------------------------------------------
# NOUNS
# -------------------------------------------------------------------------

PATTERNS

Nouns_Abs [<N>:]
Nouns_Abs_Pl
Nouns_Obl[m] [>:>] Inflection[-nm]
Nouns_Obl[-m] [>:>] Inflection[-m]
Nouns_Obl_Pl[m] [>:>] Inflection[-nm]
Nouns_Obl_Pl[-m] [>:>] Inflection[-m]


LEXICON Inflection

<gen>:лIи[nm]
<gen><pl>:лI>ол[nm]
<dat>:лъу
<erg>:{erg}ди
<dat>:й
<gen><m>:в[m]
<gen><f>:й[m]
<gen><an><sg>:б[m]
<gen><an><pl>:й[m]
<gen><inan1>:б[m]
<gen><inan2>:р[m]
<gen><m>><pl>:в>ул[m]
<gen><f>><pl>:й>ил[m]
<gen><an><pl>><pl>:й>ил[m]
<gen><inan1>><pl>:б>ул[m]
<gen><inan2>><pl>:р>ул[m]
<aff><m>:во
<aff><f>:йо
<aff><an><sg>:бо
<aff><an><pl>:йо
<aff><inan1>:бо
<aff><inan2>:ро
<sub><ess>:кьи
<sub><lat>:кьи
<sub>><el>:кьи>кку
<super><ess>:ъа
<super><lat>:ъо
<super>><el>:ъа>кку
<in><ess>:ла
<in><lat>:ди
<in>><el>:ла>кку
<inter><ess>:лIи
<inter><lat>:лIи
<inter>><el>:лIи>кку
<ad><ess>:ха
<ad><lat>:хо
<ad>><el>:хо>кку
<apud><ess>:хъи
<apud><lat>:хъи
<apud>><el>:хъи>кку
<cont><ess>:чIу
<cont><lat>:чIу
<cont>><el>:чIу>кку
